Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-15,164
Collection of fees; manner.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
fees imposed by sections 81-15,159 to 81-15,165 shall be collected in the
same manner as the sales tax under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, including
provisions of the act relating to interest, penalties, and collection procedures. No fees
shall be charged for any permits under section 81-15,162, and no collection
fees shall be allowed any retailer.

(2) The fees imposed
by section 81-15,162 shall be due and payable to the Tax Commissioner monthly
on or before the twenty-fifth day of the month next succeeding each monthly
period.

(3) The fees imposed by section
81-15,163 shall be collected in the same manner as the litter fee under the
Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act, including provisions of the act
relating to due dates, interest, penalties, and collection procedures. No
fees shall be charged for any permits, and no collection fees shall be allowed
any retailer.

Laws 1990, LB 163, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 22;

Laws 1994, LB 1034, § 18;

Laws 1999, LB 59, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB210, § 13.
October 1, 2011
Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act, see section 81-1534.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.